Massachusetts, session 194th, H351.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Upon the acceptance of this section by a city or town, said city or town may
assess and collect a fee for any license issued by the city or town pursuant to chapter 138 of the
General Laws when such license is sold by the licensee to another licensee. Said fee shall be
assessed at the time of approval of the transfer of the license by the city or town. Said fee shall
be established by the city or town in an amount not to exceed 25 per cent of the amount paid for
the license.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1